New York, session 2025-2026, A1302.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 1-b to read as follows: 3 1-b. No person shall be capable of holding a civil office who shall be 4 or who has ever been a foreign agent. For the purposes of this subdivi- 5 sion, the term "foreign agent" means a person who acts at the order, 6 request, or under the direction or control of a foreign government, 7 organization or person outside of the United States or persons who are 8 controlled or subsidized in major part by a foreign government, organ- 9 ization or person outside of the United States. 10 § 2. The election law is amended by adding a new section 2-126 to read 11 as follows: 12 § 2-126. Party positions; prohibited persons. No person who is or has 13 ever been a foreign agent shall hold a party position. For the purposes 14 of this section, the term "foreign agent" means a person who acts at the 15 order, request, or under the direction or control of a foreign govern- 16 ment, organization or person outside of the United States or persons who 17 are controlled or subsidized in major part by a foreign government, 18 organization or person outside of the United States. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02403-01-5